North Carolina, session 2025, HB1141.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

MEDICAID REBASE FUNDING
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of three hundred nineteen
million dollars ($319,000,000) in recurring funds and associated receipts, beginning with the
2025-2026 fiscal year, and an additional sum of seven hundred twenty-eight million dollars
($728,000,000) in recurring funds and associated receipts, beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal
year. These funds shall be used to adjust Medicaid funding to account for projected changes in
enrollment, enrollment mix, service and capitation costs, and federal match rates, as well as the
implementation of the Children and Families Specialty Plan in December 2025.
SECTION 1.(b) This section is retroactively effective July 1, 2025.

CLOSED PROVIDER NETWORK FOR RESEARCH-BASED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
TREATMENT PROVIDERS
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 108D-22 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108D-22. PHP provider networks.
*H1141-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Except as provided in G.S. 108D-23 and G.S. 108D-24, each PHP shall develop and
maintain a provider network that meets access to care requirements for its enrollees. A PHP may
not exclude providers a provider from their networks the PHP's network except for failure (i) if
the provider fails to meet objective quality standards standards, or refusal (ii) if the provider
refuses to accept network rates. rates, or (iii) in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
Notwithstanding the previous sentence, a PHP must include all providers in its geographical
coverage area that are designated essential providers by the Department in accordance with
subdivision (b) of this section, unless the Department approves an alternative arrangement for
securing the types of services offered by the essential providers.
…
(c) Each PHP shall develop and maintain a closed network of providers applicable only
to the provision of research-based behavioral health treatment services."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 108D-24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108D-24. Children and families specialty plan networks.
(a) The entity operating the children and families specialty plan shall develop and
maintain a closed network of providers only as provided in this section.
(b) The requirement to operate a closed network is applicable only to the provision of the
following services:
(1) Intensive in-home services.
(2) Multisystemic therapy.
(3) Residential treatment services.
(4) Services provided in psychiatric residential treatment facilities.
(5) Research-based behavioral health treatment services.
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 108D-35 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108D-35. Services covered by PHPs.
(a) Capitated PHP contracts shall cover all Medicaid services, including physical health
services, prescription drugs, long-term services and supports, and behavioral health services,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(b) The capitated contracts required by this section shall not cover any of the following:
(1) Medicaid services covered by the local management entities/managed care
organizations (LME/MCOs) under the combined 1915(b) and (c) waivers,
1915(b)(3) services, and any services approved under the 1915(i) option shall
not be covered under a standard benefit plan, except that all capitated PHP
contracts shall cover the following services:
…
l. Research-based intensive behavioral health treatment.
…."

ELIMINATION OF STATUTORY TRIGGERS FOR DISCONTINUATION OF
COVERAGE FOR THE MEDICAID EXPANSION POPULATION
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 108A-54.3B is repealed.
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 108A-54.3C is repealed.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 1141-First Edition